District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.84

Repealed

Two-year report of domestic and foreign corporations — Procedure for filing.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 298, Pub. L. 87-569, § 84
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-42, § 2(b), 42 DCR 3285
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-181, § 2(b), 43 DCR 4503
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.84.
1981 Ed., § 29-585.
1973 Ed., § 29-1084.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2(c), 3(a) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-150, July 20, 1996, law notification 44 DCR 2863).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125) and § 3(a) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
For temporary suspension in section of references to 5-year reporting, filing, or payment of fees requirements until after December 31, 1996, at which time the 1-year or annual requirements shall be in effect and the annual report fee shall be $25, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125).
For temporary suspension of the 5-year reporting provision, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
Preparation and payment of appropriate taxes: Section 2(g) of D.C. Law 11-181 provided that nothing in that act shall be construed or interpreted as repealing or affecting any requirement of a domestic or foreign corporation to prepare and submit annual tax forms, or to pay any appropriate District or federal tax, as provided in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia or the United States.